Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1148.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "owner" in section 2 of the act of October 17, 2008 (P.L.1645, No.132), known as the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Owner."(1) The term includes any of the following:123456789101112131415161718 (i) An owner of a private residence, including any person authorized by an owner to act on the owner's behalf to order, contract for or purchase a home improvement.(ii) A person entitled to the performance of the work of a contractor pursuant to a home improvement contract.(2) An owner of a private residence shall not be required to reside in the residence to be deemed an owner under this act. T o meet this definition for the purposes of exemption to register as a contractor for home improvements, the owner of a private residence shall be required to maintain ownership and possession of the residence for one year following the completion of construction.(3) A person who owns three or more private residences in this Commonwealth shall not be deemed an owner except with respect to the person's primary residence or the part of the building which houses the primary residence of the owner and those private residences the person uses for personal recreational purposes.* * *Section 2. Section 8(a)(7) and (8) of the act are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 8. Home improvement fraud.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of home improvement fraud if, with intent to defraud or injure anyone or with knowledge that he is facilitating a fraud or injury to be perpetrated by anyone, the actor:* * *(7) alters a home improvement agreement, mortgage, 20250HB1148PN1269 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promissory note or other document incident to performing or selling a home improvement without the consent of the consumer; [or](8) directly or indirectly publishes a false or deceptive advertisement in violation of State law governing advertising about home improvement[.]; or(9) fails to register as a contractor and instead makes improvements as an owner with the intent to sell the property to a new owner without ever residing in the home.* * *Section 3. This act shall apply to contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1148PN1269 - 3 - 12345678910111213